Wyoming, session 2025, SF0027.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 19-9-403(e)(intro), (i), (ii), (iv)
by creating a new subparagraph (C) and by renumbering (C)
as (D) is amended to read:

19-9-403. Pay and allowances of officers and enlisted
persons in active state service and state active duty;
worker's compensation coverage for national guard members;
no pension denied by reason of service.
SF0027

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0078

(e) There is created the Wyoming national guard
member referral incentive program. The purpose of the
program shall be to incentivize and maximize peer-to-peer
recruiting that results in a completed accession to the
Wyoming national guard by providing a referral bonus to
Wyoming national guard members, retired military service
members, current employees of the military department or
recruits beginning the enlistment process with the Wyoming
national guard who make a successful referral.
Administration of this program shall require that:

(i) A Wyoming national guard member, retired
military service member, current employees of the military
department or recruit beginning the enlistment process with
the Wyoming national guard may provide the identity and
contact information of a person who the member believes
would be an appropriate recruitment prospect using a form
provided by the Wyoming national guard, which includes the
person's name, contact information and any other
information required by the military department;

SF0027

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0078
(ii) The military department shall keep a record
of all forms submitted under paragraph (i) of this
subsection. Upon the completed accession of a referred
person and to the extent sufficient funds are available,
the military department shall distribute a referral bonus
to the member, retired military service member or employee
who provided the successful referral. The military
department shall not distribute a referral bonus to a
referring recruit until the referring recruit has
membership in the Wyoming national guard;

(iv) As used in this subsection:

(C) "Retired military service member" means
a person who has retired from the armed forces as defined
by W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xxi), the army national guard or air
national guard;

(C)(D) "Successful referral" means
providing the identity and contact information pursuant to
paragraph (e)(i) of this subsection of any person not
already a member of the Wyoming national guard that results
in a completed accession to the Wyoming national guard.
SF0027

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0078

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0027